District of Columbia statutes.
28-4607

Penalties.

(a)

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be fined not more than not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] per violation, imprisoned for not more than 1 year, or both.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this act [this chapter] or the rules authorized by this chapter, pursuant to subchapters I and II of Chapter 18 of Title 2.

(c)

Any consumer injured by a violation of this chapter may bring an action for recovery of damages within 3 years after the signing of the contract. Judgment shall be entered for actual damages and shall in no case be less than the amount paid by the consumer to the consumer credit service organization, plus reasonable attorney’s fees and actual costs incurred to recover the damages. An award may also be entered for punitive damages.

(d)

The remedies provided pursuant to this chapter are in addition to the remedies available pursuant to any other law.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-236, § 8, 38 DCR 306
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 285(f), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 28-4607.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $500” in (a).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 285(f) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.